Washington statutes.
RCW 24.12.020

Corporate powers.

Every corporation sole shall, for the purpose of the trust, have power to contract in the same manner and to the same extent as a natural person, and may sue and be sued, and may defend in all courts and places, in all matters and proceedings whatever, and shall have authority to borrow money and give promissory notes therefor, and to secure the payment of the same by mortgage or other lien upon property, real and personal; to buy, sell, lease, mortgage and in every way deal in real and personal property in the same manner as a natural person may, and without the order of any court; to receive bequests and devises for its own use or upon trusts, to the same extent as natural persons may; and to appoint attorneys-in-fact.

[ 1915 c 79 s 2; RRS s 3885.]